Maryland, session 2026, SB0842.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Public Utilities
2–101.
(a) There is a Public Service Commission.
(b) The Commission is an independent unit in the Executive Branch of State
government.
(c) THE EXERCISE BY THE COMMISSION OF ITS AUTHORITY UNDER THIS
DIVISION IS AN ESSENTIAL GOVERNMENT FUNCTION.
(D) The Commission:
(1) shall carry out the functions assigned to it by law; AND
(2) MAY TAKE ACTIONS NECESSARY TO IMPLEMENT THE PROVISIONS
OF LAW UNDER ITS JURISDICTION.
2–104.
(a) The Commission shall appoint an Executive Secretary.
(b) The Executive Secretary serves at the pleasure of the Commission.
(c) The Executive Secretary shall:
(1) keep the records of the Commission, including a record of proceedings,
all documents required to be filed with the Commission, all orders, regulations, and
decisions of the Commission, and all dockets and files;
(2) certify true copies of those materials;
(3) designate an employee of the Commission to SERVE AS THE DEPUTY
EXECUTIVE SECRETARY WHO SHALL perform the duties of Executive Secretary when
the Executive Secretary is absent; [and]

SENATE BILL 842 3
(4) DIRECT AND SUPERVISE THE ADMINISTRATIVE AFFAIRS AND
ACTIVITIES OF THE COMMISSION IN ACCORDANCE WITH ITS REGULATIONS AND
POLICIES;
(5) APPROVE ALL ACCOUNTS FOR SALARIES, PER DIEM PAYMENTS,
AND ALL ALLOWABLE EXPENSES OF THE COMMISSION, ITS EMPLOYEES, AND ITS
CONSULTANTS;
(6) APPROVE ALL EXPENSES INCIDENTAL TO OPERATING THE
COMMISSION; AND
[(4)] (7) perform the other duties that the Commission prescribes.
(d) With the approval of the Commission and in conformity with Title 10, Subtitle
6, Part III of the State Government Article, the Executive Secretary may destroy any record
or document that the Commission possesses, including a record or document required by
law to be filed with the Commission, if:
(1) the record or document has been on file for at least 3 years; and
(2) the Executive Secretary considers the document to be obsolete.
2–108.
(a) (1) The principal office of the Commission shall be in Baltimore City at the
place that the Commission selects.
(2) Except for legal holidays, the offices of the Commission shall be open
for business during regular business hours from Monday through Friday and at other times
as the Commission considers necessary.
(b) (1) The Commission shall meet at the times and places in the State as the
Commission considers necessary.
(2) For purposes of the Open Meetings Act, a project site visit or
educational field tour may not be considered a meeting of the Commission if no
organizational business is conducted.
(c) The Commission shall have a seal.
(d) (1) (I) The State budget shall provide sufficient money for the
Commission to hire, develop, and organize a staff to perform the functions of the
Commission, including analyzing data submitted to the Commission and participating in
proceedings as provided in § 3–104 of this article.
(II) THE COMMISSION SHALL:

SENATE BILL 842
1. EACH FISCAL YEAR, SUBMIT THE COMMISSION’S
OPERATING PROGRAM BUDGET TO THE DEPARTMENT OF BUDGET AND
MANAGEMENT FOR INCLUSION IN THE STATE BUDGET BOOK FOR INFORMATIONAL
PURPOSES;
2. KEEP BUSINESS AND ACCOUNTING RECORDS USING
GENERALLY ACCEPTED ACCOUNTING PRINCIPLES; AND
3. AT THE END OF EACH FISCAL YEAR, HAVE AN
INDEPENDENT CERTIFIED PUBLIC ACCOUNTANT AUDIT THE ACCOUNTS AND
TRANSACTIONS OF THE COMMISSION.
(2) (i) As the Commission considers necessary, the Commission [shall
hire] MAY EMPLOY OR RETAIN AS INDEPENDENT CONTRACTORS, AND SET
COMPENSATION FOR, CONSULTANTS AND OTHER experts including economists, cost of
capital experts, rate design experts, accountants, engineers, transportation specialists,
[and] lawyers, FINANCIAL EXPERTS, MODELING EXPERTS, CLIMATE EXPERTS,
MANAGERS AND OTHER PROFESSIONAL PERSONNEL, AND ADMINISTRATIVE STAFF
AND PERSONNEL.
(ii) To assist in the regulation of intrastate hazardous liquid
pipelines under Title 11, Subtitle 2 of this article, the Commission shall include on its staff
at least one engineer who specializes in the storage of and the transportation of hazardous
liquid materials by pipeline.
(3) The Commission shall include on its staff one or more employees that
are experts in cybersecurity to:
(i) advise the Chairman of the Commission and the commissioners
on measures to improve oversight of the cybersecurity practices of public service companies;
(ii) consult with the Office of Security Management on cybersecurity
issues related to utility regulation;
(iii) assist the Commission in monitoring the minimum security
standards developed under § 5–306 of this article;
(iv) participate in briefings to discuss cybersecurity practices based
on:
1. applicable National Association of Regulatory Utility
Commissioners guidance; and

SENATE BILL 842 5
2. improvements to cybersecurity practices recommended in
the cybersecurity assessments required under § 5–306 of this article; and
(v) support public service companies that do not meet minimum
security standards with remediating vulnerabilities or addressing cybersecurity
assessment findings.
[(4) The Commission may retain on a case by case basis additional experts
as required for a particular matter.]
[(5)] (4) The lawyers who represent the Commission staff in proceedings
before the Commission shall be appointed by the Commission and shall be organized and
operate independently of the office of General Counsel.
[(6)] (5) (i) As required, the Commission shall hire public utility law
judges.
(ii) Public utility law judges are a separate organizational unit and
shall report directly to the Commission.
[(7)] (6) The Commission shall hire personal staff members for each
commissioner as required to provide advice, draft proposed orders and rulings, and perform
other personal staff functions.
[(8)] (7) (i) The Commission shall:
1. collaborate with the Office of Security Management to
establish cybersecurity standards and best practices for regulated entities, taking into
account utility needs and capabilities based on size;
2. periodically share information on cybersecurity initiatives
and best practices with municipal electric utilities; and
3. beginning on or before January 1, 2025, and every 2 years
thereafter:
A. collect certifications of a public service company’s
compliance with standards used in the assessments conducted under § 5–306 of this article
for cybersecurity–related policies and procedures; and
B. submit a report to the State Chief Information Security
Officer, or the Officer’s designee.
(ii) The report required under subparagraph (i) of this paragraph
shall include:

SENATE BILL 842
1. a general overview of cybersecurity technology and
policies used by public service companies in the State, grouped by the following types:
A. investor–owned electric companies;
B. electric cooperatives;
C. municipal electric companies;
D. gas companies; and
E. water companies;
2. general recommendations for improving cybersecurity
technology and policies used by public service companies in the State, grouped by the
following types:
A. investor–owned electric companies;
B. electric cooperatives;
C. municipal electric companies;
D. gas companies; and
E. water companies; and
3. for each certification collected:
A. the name of the public service company;
B. the date of the public service company’s most recent
cybersecurity assessment;
C. the cybersecurity framework used in the cybersecurity
assessment of the public service company; and
D. the name of the entity that completed the cybersecurity
assessment.
[(9)] (8) Subject to § 3–104 of this article, the Commission may delegate
to a commissioner or personnel the authority to perform an administrative function
necessary to carry out a duty of the Commission.
[(10) (i) Except as provided in subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph or
otherwise by law, all personnel of the Commission are subject to the provisions of the State
Personnel and Pensions Article.

SENATE BILL 842 7
(ii) The following are in the executive service, management service,
or are special appointments in the State Personnel Management System:
1. each commissioner of the Commission;
2. the Executive Director;
3. the General Counsel and each assistant general counsel;
4. the Executive Secretary;
5. the commissioners’ personal staff members;
6. the chief public utility law judge; and
7. each license hearing officer.]
(e) (1) (I) THE COMMISSION SHALL ESTABLISH FOR THE EMPLOYEES
OF THE COMMISSION A PERSONNEL MANAGEMENT SYSTEM THAT OPERATES
INDEPENDENTLY OF THE STATE PERSONNEL MANAGEMENT SYSTEM.
(II) THE PERSONNEL MANAGEMENT SYSTEM ESTABLISHED BY
THE COMMISSION SHALL:
1. BE BASED ON MERIT; AND
2. INCLUDE FAIR AND EQUITABLE PROCEDURES FOR:
A. APPOINTING, HIRING, PROMOTING, TERMINATING,
AND REMOVING EMPLOYEES; AND
B. REDRESSING GRIEVANCES.
(2) ALL COMMISSION EMPLOYEES ARE SUBJECT TO DIVISIONS II
AND III OF THE STATE PERSONNEL AND PENSIONS ARTICLE.
[(1)] (3) The compensation of [the following personnel] ALL EMPLOYEES
shall be determined by the Commission and, if possible, in accordance with the State pay
plan[:
(1) the Executive Director;
(2) the General Counsel;

SENATE BILL 842
(3) the special appointment attorneys in the office of General Counsel;
(4) the Executive Secretary;
(5) the chief public utility law judge;
(6) each license hearing officer; and
(7) all Commission personnel in positions in:
(i) the management service; and
(ii) professional and technical classifications unique to the
Commission].
(4) ALL PERMANENT EMPLOYEES OF THE COMMISSION SHALL:
(I) BE CONSIDERED AS PERMANENT STATE EMPLOYEES FOR
THE PURPOSES OF TRANSFERRING TO OR FROM ANOTHER POSITION IN STATE
GOVERNMENT;
(II) RECEIVE CREDIT FOR SERVICE WITH THE COMMISSION FOR
ANY ACCRUED LEAVE AND BENEFITS; AND
(III) BE GRANTED THE SAME COMPENSATION CONSIDERATION
THAT WOULD BE PROVIDED TO AN EMPLOYEE TRANSFERRING WITHIN ANOTHER
DIVISION OF STATE GOVERNMENT.
(5) THE COMMISSION SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO GOVERN THE
PERSONNEL MANAGEMENT SYSTEM ADOPTED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION,
INCLUDING:
(I) PROCEDURES FOR APPOINTING, HIRING, PROMOTING,
TERMINATING, REMOVING, AND REINSTATING EMPLOYEES;
(II) POLICIES FOR LEAVE; AND
(III) PROCEDURES FOR HEARING AND REDRESSING GRIEVANCES
AND DISCIPLINARY ACTIONS.
[(f) (1) At least 45 days before the effective date of the change, the Commission
shall submit to the Secretary of Budget and Management each change to salary plans that
involves increases or decreases in salary ranges other than those associated with routine
reclassifications and promotions or general salary increases approved by the General
Assembly.

SENATE BILL 842 9
(2) Reportable changes include creation or abolition of classes, regrading
the classes from one established range to another, changes in salary guidelines to
administer the pay schedules, or creation of new pay schedules or ranges.
(3) The Secretary of Budget and Management shall:
(i) review the proposed changes; and
(ii) at least 15 days before the effective date of the proposed changes,
advise the Commission whether the changes would have an adverse effect on comparable
State jobs.
(4) Failure of the Secretary to respond in a timely manner is not considered
a statement of adverse effect.
(g) On or before January 31 of each year, the Commission shall report to the
Secretary of Budget and Management and, subject to § 2–1257 of the State Government
Article, to the General Assembly setting forth all personnel positions, classifications, and
salaries in the Commission as of the end of the preceding calendar year.]
(F) AT ANY TIME, THE COMMISSION MAY BE SUBJECT TO AN AUDIT AND
EXAMINATION OF ACCOUNTS AND TRANSACTIONS BY THE OFFICE OF LEGISLATIVE
AUDITS.
(G) THE COMMISSION IS EXEMPT FROM TAXATION BY THE STATE AND
LOCAL GOVERNMENT.
Article – State Finance and Procurement
11–203.
(C–1) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN TITLE 12, SUBTITLE 4 AND TITLE 14,
SUBTITLE 3 OF THIS ARTICLE, THIS DIVISION II DOES NOT APPLY TO THE PUBLIC
SERVICE COMMISSION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That all employees of the Public
Service Commission that are subject to the State Personnel Management System on the
effective date of this Act shall remain subject to the State Personnel Management System
until the Public Service Commission adopts a personnel management system that is
independent of the State Personnel Management System in accordance with § 2–108(e) of
the Public Utilities Article, as enacted by Section 1 of this Act.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.